Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 60. General Provisions.

Sec. 14.60.010.
Definitions.

In this title, unless the context otherwise requires,

“attendance area” means the geographic area designated by the department to be served by a school;

“board” means the state Board of Education and Early Development;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of education and early development;

“department” means the Department of Education and Early Development;

“governing body” means the school board of a borough or city school district or a regional educational attendance area;

“public schools” include elementary schools, high schools, citizenship night schools for adults, and other public educational institutions that may be established;

“regional educational attendance area” means an educational service area in the unorganized borough which may or may not include a military reservation, and that contains one or more public schools of grade levels K-12 or any portion of those grade levels that are to be operated under the management and control of a single regional school board;

“school board” means the school board of a borough or city school district or a regional educational attendance area.

History.

(§ 37-1-3 ACLA 1949; am § 58 ch 98 SLA 1966; am §§ 27 — 29 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1972; am §§ 29 — 32 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in paragraph (2) in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Cross references. —

For definition of “school year,” see AS

14.03.020

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective April 4, 2006, substituted “that” for “which” in paragraph (6), and deleted the former second clause of that paragraph, which had read, “however, nothing in this title includes schools for Alaska Natives under the control of the federal government and administered and supervised through the Bureau of Indian Affairs”.